Utah statutes.
26-8a-254.   Trauma center designations and guidelines.

(1)  The department, after seeking the advice of the trauma system advisory committee, shall establish by rule:

(a)  trauma center designation requirements; and

(b)  model state guidelines for triage, treatment, transportation, and transfer of trauma patients to the most appropriate health care facility.

(2)  The department shall designate as a trauma center each hospital that:

(a)  voluntarily requests a trauma center designation; and

(b)  meets the applicable requirements established pursuant to Subsection (1).

